Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Oversight of Legislative Ethics

6.681.
Advisory opinions.

The commission may render advisory opinions concerning matters under its jurisdiction, based upon real or hypothetical circumstances, when requested by:

Any person covered by this code;

Any person who is personally and directly involved in the matter; or

The commission upon its own initiative.

An advisory opinion shall be requested in writing and shall state relevant facts and ask specific questions. The request for the advisory opinion shall remain confidential unless confidentiality is waived, in writing, by the requestor.

Advisory opinions shall be based on the Kentucky Revised Statutes as written and shall not be based on the personal opinions of commission members as to legislative intent or the spirit of the law.

The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish criteria under which it may issue confidential advisory opinions. All other advisory opinions shall be published except that before an advisory opinion is made public, it shall be modified so that the identity of any person associated with the opinion shall not be revealed.

The confidentiality of an advisory opinion may be waived either:

In writing by the person who requested the opinion; or

By majority vote of the members of the commission, if a person makes or purports to make public the substance or any portion of an advisory opinion requested by or on behalf of the person. The commission may vote to make public the advisory opinion request and related materials.

A written advisory opinion issued by the commission shall be binding on the commission in any subsequent proceeding concerning the facts and circumstances of the particular case if no intervening facts or circumstances arise which would change the opinion of the commission if they had existed at the time the opinion was rendered. However, if any fact determined by the commission to be material was omitted or misstated in the request for an opinion, the commission shall not be bound by the opinion.

A written advisory opinion shall be admissible in the defense of any criminal prosecution or civil proceeding for violations of this code for actions taken in reliance on that opinion.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 42, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 479, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

6.685.
Inquiries into suspected violation of guides to ethical conduct. [Repealed.]

6.686.
Complaint procedure — Preliminary investigations — Penalty for false complaint of misconduct.

The commission shall have jurisdiction to investigate and proceed as to any violation of this code upon the filing of a complaint. The complaint shall be a written statement alleging a violation against one (1) or more named persons and stating the essential facts constituting the violation charged. The complaint shall be made under oath and signed by the complaining party before a person who is legally empowered to administer oaths. The commission shall have no jurisdiction in the absence of a complaint. A member of the commission may file a complaint.

Within ten (10) days of the filing of a complaint, the commission shall cause a copy of the complaint to be served by certified mail upon the person alleged to have committed the violation.

Within twenty (20) days of service of the complaint the person alleged to have committed the violation may file an answer with the commission. The filing of an answer is wholly permissive, and no inferences shall be drawn from the failure to file an answer.

Not later than ten (10) days after the commission receives the answer, or the time expires for the filing of an answer, the commission shall initiate a preliminary inquiry into any alleged violation of this code. If the commission determines upon the affirmative vote of at least five (5) members, at either a regularly scheduled meeting, or a teleconference meeting called upon the chair’s oral or written notice to all members of the commission, that the complaint fails to state a claim of an ethics violation, the complaint shall be dismissed.

Within thirty (30) days of the commencement of the inquiry, the commission shall give notice of the status of the complaint and a general statement of the applicable law to the person alleged to have committed a violation.

A complaint may be filed against a former legislator, a former legislative agent, or a former employer of a legislative agent within one (1) year of the date he or she left office or terminated lobbying registration. The one (1) year limitation shall not apply if a complaint alleges a violation of KRS

6.757

.

The applicable criminal statutes of limitation shall not apply to ethical misconduct under KRS

6.601

to

6.849

.

All commission proceedings, including the complaint and answer and other records relating to a preliminary inquiry, shall be confidential until a final determination is made by the commission, except:

The commission may turn over to the Attorney General, the United States Attorney, Commonwealth’s attorney, or county attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense allegedly occurred, evidence which may be used in criminal proceedings; and

If the complainant or alleged violator publicly discloses the existence of a preliminary inquiry, the commission may publicly confirm the existence of the inquiry and, in its discretion, make public any documents which were issued to either party.

The commission shall afford a person who is the subject of a preliminary inquiry an opportunity to appear in response to the allegations in the complaint. The person shall have the right to be represented by counsel, to appear and be heard under oath, and to offer evidence in response to the allegations in the complaint.

If the commission determines by the answer or in the preliminary inquiry that the complaint does not allege facts sufficient to constitute a violation of this code, the commission shall immediately terminate the matter and notify in writing the complainant and the person alleged to have committed a violation. The commission may confidentially inform the alleged violator of potential violations and provide information to ensure future compliance with the law. If the alleged violator publicly discloses the existence of such action by the commission, the commission may confirm the existence of the action and, in its discretion, make public any documents that were issued to the alleged violator.

If the commission, during the course of the preliminary inquiry, finds probable cause to believe that a violation of this code has occurred, the commission shall notify the alleged violator of the finding, and the commission may, upon majority vote:

Due to mitigating circumstances such as lack of significant economic advantage or gain by the alleged violator, lack of significant economic loss to the state, or lack of significant impact on public confidence in government, confidentially reprimand, in writing, the alleged violator for potential violations of the law and provide a copy of the reprimand to the presiding officer of the house in which the alleged violator serves, or the alleged violator’s employer, if the alleged violator is a legislative agent. The proceedings leading to a confidential reprimand and the reprimand itself shall remain confidential except that, if the alleged violator publicly discloses the existence of such an action, the commission may confirm the existence of the action and, in its discretion, make public any documents which were issued to the alleged violator; or

Initiate an adjudicatory proceeding to determine whether there has been a violation.

Any person who knowingly files with the commission a false complaint of misconduct on the part of any legislator or other person shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 39, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 479, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 211, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 493, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2020 ch. 127, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

6.690.
Board of ethics, qualifications, membership, terms of members, vacancies, expenses of board members. [Repealed.]

6.691.
Adjudicatory proceedings — Action by commission — Appeal.

The Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and the Kentucky Rules of Evidence shall apply to all commission adjudicatory hearings. All testimony in a commission adjudicatory proceeding shall be under oath. All parties shall have the right to call and examine witnesses, to introduce exhibits, to cross-examine witnesses, to submit evidence, and to be represented by counsel and any other due process rights, privileges, and responsibilities of a witness appearing before the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Before testifying, all witnesses shall be given a copy of the regulations governing commission proceedings. All witnesses shall be entitled to be represented by counsel.

Any person whose name is mentioned during adjudicatory proceedings of the commission and who may be adversely affected thereby may appear personally before the commission on the person’s own behalf, with or without attorney, to give a statement in opposition to such adverse mention or file a written statement of that opposition for incorporation into the record of proceeding.

All adjudicatory proceedings of the commission carried out pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be public, unless the members vote to go into executive session in accordance with KRS

61.810

.

Within thirty (30) days after the end of an adjudicatory proceeding pursuant to the provisions of this section, the commission shall meet in executive session for the purpose of reviewing the evidence before it. Within thirty (30) days after completion of deliberations, the commission shall publish a written report of its findings and conclusions which shall be based on whether the person accused has complied with the statute as written.

No penalty provided for in this section shall be imposed except as the result of an adjudicatory proceeding held upon the filing of a complaint. Notwithstanding the administrative penalties provided for in KRS

6.797

,

6.807

, and

6.821

, the commission, upon a finding pursuant to an adjudicatory proceeding that there has been clear and convincing proof of a violation of this code, may:

Issue an order requiring the violator to cease and desist the violation;

Issue an order requiring the violator to file any report, statement, or other information as required by this code;

In writing, publicly reprimand the violator for potential violations of the law and provide a copy of the reprimand to the presiding officer of the house in which the alleged violator serves;

In writing, recommend to the house in which the violator serves that the violator be sanctioned as recommended by the commission, which may include a recommendation for censure or expulsion;

Issue an order requiring the violator to pay a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000); or

Revoke the registration of any legislative agent or employer for a period not to exceed five (5) years. During the period of the revocation, the agent or employer or any other entity which constitutes nothing more than the legislative agent or employer operating under a different name or identity shall not be permitted to register as a legislative agent or employer.

The commission may refer to the Attorney General, county attorney, or Commonwealth’s attorney of the appropriate jurisdiction, for prosecution evidence of criminal violations of this code. The Attorney General shall have responsibility for all prosecutions under the law and may request from the commission all evidence collected in its investigation.

Findings of fact or final determinations by the commission that a violation of this code has been committed, or any testimony related to the commission’s findings of fact or final determinations, shall not be admissible in criminal proceedings in the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Evidence collected by the commission may be used in a criminal proceeding if otherwise relevant.

Any person found by the commission to have committed a violation of this code may appeal the action to the Franklin Circuit Court. The appeal shall be initiated within thirty (30) days after the date of the final action of the commission by filing a petition with the court against the commission. The commission shall transmit to the clerk of the court all evidence considered by the commission at the public hearing. The court shall hear the appeal upon the record as certified by the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 40, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 479, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 493, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

6.695.
Employes, agents, consultants — Compensation. [Repealed.]

6.696.
Effect of felony conviction on state retirement benefits.

A legislator or former legislator convicted of a felony relating to his duties as a legislator, in any state or federal court of competent jurisdiction, shall forfeit rights and benefits earned after September 16, 1993, under the state administered retirement plan to which contributions have been made as a result of his service in the General Assembly, except for the return of his accumulated contributions and interest credited on those contributions.

The payment of retirement benefits ordered forfeited shall be stayed pending any appeal of the conviction. If the conviction is reversed on final judgment, no retirement benefits shall be forfeited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 44, effective September 16, 1993.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the Legislative Retirement Plan is deemed an “inviolable contract,” Section 44 of Senate Bill 7 of the 1993 First Extra Session of the Kentucky General Assembly (now codified as KRS

6.696

) providing for forfeiture of benefits under the plan, under certain circumstances, may only be applied as against a legislator or former legislator who joins the plan after September 17, 1993.

OAG 94-28

.

6.700.
Functions, powers, and duties of board of ethics. [Repealed.]